Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-206
Bingo supplies, defined.

Bingo supplies shall mean any items other than bingo equipment which may be used by a player to assist in the playing of bingo, including, but not limited to, daubers, chips, and glue sticks.

Laws 1978, LB 351, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 9-129;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 7;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 10.